src/fst/morphology/stems/verbalnouns.lexc
!! # Verbal nouns
!==============================================================================
!! Ainm Briathra & Aidiacht Briathra - 
!! Verbal Nouns & Verbal Adjectives
!! - E Uí Dhonnchadha
!! 2003 
!! - Nov 2005 version 3 
!! Updated May 2008
!!
!! - verbal nouns have vn lemma rather than verb lemma
!! verbal noun gen is same as verbal adj except for new vns ending in -áil
!! and some other e.g. úsáide, úsáidte 
!! CW manually checked Foclóir Póca entries and added FGB entries
!! - Updated Dec 2018: reorganised and verbal nouns have verb lemma again

!==============================================================================

LEXICON VerbalNounsN
aisteoir+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:aisteoireacht VN-INIT;
bádóir+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:bádóireacht VN-INIT;
béicíl+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:béicíl VN-INIT;
bradach+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI:bradaíl VN-INIT;
cailliúint+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI:cailliúint VN-INIT;
caint+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:caint VN-INIT;
ceisneamh+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI:ceisneamh VN-INIT;
ceol+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VT:ceol VN-INIT;
cogarnach+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:cogarnach VN-INIT;
comhrá+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:comhrá VN-INIT;
cothabháil+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI:cothabháil VN-INIT;
crónán+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:crónán VN-INIT;
clubáil+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:clubáil VN-INIT;
feadaíl+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:feadaíl VN-INIT;
fearthainn+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI:fearthainn VN-INIT;
fíochán+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI:fíochán VN-INIT;
fionnachtain+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:fionnachtain VN-INIT;
fosaíocht+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:fosaíocht VN-INIT;
iascaire+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI:iascaireacht VN-INIT;
innilt+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI:innilt VN-INIT;
léitheoireacht+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:léitheoireacht VN-INIT;
magadh+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:magadh VN-INIT;
obair+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:obair VN-INIT;
peataireacht+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:peataireacht VN-INIT;
póitseáil+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI:póitseáil VN-INIT;
preabarnach+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI:preabarnach VN-INIT;
siamsa+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:siamsaíocht VN-INIT;
smolchaitheamh+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:smolchaitheamh VN-INIT;
spailpín+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:spailpínteacht VN-INIT;
spraoi+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:spraoi VN-INIT;
staidéar+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:staidéar VN-INIT;
súgradh+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:súgradh VN-INIT;
súil+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:súil VN-INIT;
tincéir+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:tincéireacht VN-INIT;
tnúthán+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:tnúthán VN-INIT;
tuilleadh+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI:tuilleadh VN-INIT;
únfairt+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:únfairt VN-INIT;
siopadóir+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI:siopadóireacht VN-INIT;
LEXICON VerbalNounsGenN
aisteoir+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:aisteoireachta VN-INIT;
bádóir+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:bádóireachta VN-INIT;
béicíl+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:béicíola VN-INIT;
bradach+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI+Gen:bradaíola VN-INIT;
cailliúint+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI+Gen:cailliúna VN-INIT;
caint+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:cainte VN-INIT;
ceisneamh+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI+Gen:ceisnimh VN-INIT;
ceol+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VT+Gen:ceoil VN-INIT;
cogarnach+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:cogarnaí VN-INIT;
comhrá+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:comhráite VN-INIT;
cothabháil+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI+Gen:cothabhála VN-INIT;
crónán+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:crónáin VN-INIT;
feadaíl+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:feadaíola VN-INIT;
fearthainn+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI+Gen:fearthainne VN-INIT;
fíochán+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI+Gen:fíocháin VN-INIT;
fionnachtain+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:fionnachtana VN-INIT;
fosaíocht+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:fosaíochta VN-INIT;
iascaire+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI+Gen:iascaireachta VN-INIT;
innilt+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI+Gen:innilte VN-INIT;
léitheoireacht+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:léitheoireacht VN-INIT;
magadh+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:magaidh VN-INIT;
obair+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:oibre VN-INIT;
peataireacht+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:peataireachta VN-INIT;
póitseáil+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI+Gen:póitseála VN-INIT;
preabarnach+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI+Gen:preabarnaí VN-INIT;
siamsa+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:siamsaíochta VN-INIT;
smolchaitheamh+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:smolchaithimh VN-INIT;
spailpín+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:spailpínteachta VN-INIT;
spraoi+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:spraoi VN-INIT;
staidéar+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:staidéir VN-INIT;
súgradh+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:súgartha VN-INIT;
súil+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:súile VN-INIT;
tincéir+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:tincéireachta VN-INIT;
tnúthán+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:tnútháin VN-INIT;
tuilleadh+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VTI+Gen:tuillidh VN-INIT;
únfairt+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:únfairte VN-INIT;
siopadóir+Verbal+Noun+NStem+VI+Gen:siopadóireachta VN-INIT;
!! 
!***********************************************************************
!!					CONTINUATION CLASSES 
!!   INCLUDED HERE AS THEY ARE NOT SHARED WITH ANY OTHER POS
!***********************************************************************
LEXICON	VN-INIT !!≈ **@CODE@**
#; !!≈ - @CODE@
+Len:^IM^Sé	#; !!≈ - @CODE@
+Ecl:^IM^Urú	#; !!≈ - @CODE@
+hPref:^IM^hv	#; !!≈ - @CODE@

LEXICON	VA-INIT !!≈ **@CODE@**
#; !!≈ - @CODE@
+Len:^IM^Sé	#; !!≈ - @CODE@
!***********************************************************************

LEXICON VerbalNounsV !!≈ -  **@CODE@** 
airbheartaigh+Verbal+Noun+VT:airbheartú VN-INIT;
anótáil+Verbal+Noun+VT:anótáil VN-INIT;
athaontaigh+Verbal+Noun+VT:athaontú VN-INIT;
athphlandáil+Verbal+Noun+VTI:athphlandáil VN-INIT;
baist+Verbal+Noun+VT:baisteadh VN-INIT;
bíog+Verbal+Noun+VI:bíogadh VN-INIT;
bradaigh+Verbal+Noun+VTI:bradú VN-INIT;
bronn+Verbal+Noun+VT:bronnadh VN-INIT;
caochfháithimigh+Verbal+Noun+VT:caochfháithimiú VN-INIT;
cladáil+Verbal+Noun+VT:cladáil VN-INIT;
cogair+Verbal+Noun+VI:cogar VN-INIT;
comhtharlaigh+Verbal+Noun+VI:comhtharlú VN-INIT;
cros+Verbal+Noun+VT:crosadh VN-INIT;
damhnaigh+Verbal+Noun+VT:damhnú VN-INIT;
dílsigh+Verbal+Noun+VT:dílsiú VN-INIT;
dreideáil+Verbal+Noun+VTI:dreideáil VN-INIT;
éist+Verbal+Noun+VTI:éisteacht VN-INIT;
fírinnigh+Verbal+Noun+VT:fírinniú VN-INIT;
fuascail+Verbal+Noun+VT:fuascailt VN-INIT;
gléghlan+Verbal+Noun+VT:gléghlanadh VN-INIT;
guailleáil+Verbal+Noun+VTI:guailleáil VN-INIT;
iomraigh+Verbal+Noun+VTI:iomramh VN-INIT;
léarscáiligh+Verbal+Noun+VT:léarscáiliú VN-INIT;
luaidh+Verbal+Noun+VT:luadh VN-INIT;
milsigh+Verbal+Noun+VTI:milsiú VN-INIT;
nuashonraigh+Verbal+Noun+VTI:nuashonrú VN-INIT;
plandáil+Verbal+Noun+VT:plandáil VN-INIT;
radaigh+Verbal+Noun+VTI:radú VN-INIT;
rómhair+Verbal+Noun+VTI:rómhar VN-INIT;
scátáil+Verbal+Noun+VI:scátáil VN-INIT;
sead+Verbal+Noun+VTI:seadadh VN-INIT;
sleamhnaigh+Verbal+Noun+VTI:sleamhnú VN-INIT;
sótáil+Verbal+Noun+VT:sótáil VN-INIT;
stápláil+Verbal+Noun+VT:stápláil VN-INIT;
tairbhigh+Verbal+Noun+VTI:tairbhiú VN-INIT;
timpeallghearr+Verbal+Noun+VT:timpeallghearradh VN-INIT;
trampáil+Verbal+Noun+VT:trampáil VN-INIT;
ualaigh+Verbal+Noun+VT:ualú VN-INIT;
LEXICON VerbalAdjs
aeroiriúnaigh+Verbal+Adj:aeroiriúnaithe VA-INIT;
airbheartaigh+Verbal+Adj:airbheartaithe VA-INIT;
aithris+Verbal+Adj:aithriste VA-INIT;
anótáil+Verbal+Adj:anótáilte VA-INIT;
asaltaigh+Verbal+Adj:asaltaithe VA-INIT;
athaontaigh+Verbal+Adj:athaontaithe VA-INIT;
atheaspórtáil+Verbal+Adj:atheaspórtáilte VA-INIT;
athphlandáil+Verbal+Adj:athphlandáilte VA-INIT;
báigh+Verbal+Adj:báite VA-INIT;
baist+Verbal+Adj:baiste VA-INIT;
beachtaigh+Verbal+Adj:beachtaithe VA-INIT;
bioraigh+Verbal+Adj:bioraithe VA-INIT;
bocsáil+Verbal+Adj:bocsáilte VA-INIT;
braigeáil+Verbal+Adj:braigeáilte VA-INIT;
brostaigh+Verbal+Adj:brostaithe VA-INIT;
caígh+Verbal+Adj:caíte VA-INIT;
caoin+Verbal+Adj:caointe VA-INIT;
ceiliúir+Verbal+Adj:ceiliúrtha VA-INIT;
clamhair+Verbal+Adj:clamhartha VA-INIT;
clóscríobh+Verbal+Adj:clóscríofa VA-INIT;
coiceáil+Verbal+Adj:coiceáilte VA-INIT;
comardaigh+Verbal+Adj:comardaithe VA-INIT;
comhthogh+Verbal+Adj:comhthofa VA-INIT;
crandaigh+Verbal+Adj:crandaithe VA-INIT;
crosáil+Verbal+Adj:crosáilte VA-INIT;
cuingrigh+Verbal+Adj:cuingrithe VA-INIT;
damhsaigh+Verbal+Adj:damhsaithe VA-INIT;
deiseáil+Verbal+Adj:deiseáilte VA-INIT;
díluacháil+Verbal+Adj:díluacháilte VA-INIT;
diúl+Verbal+Adj:diúlta VA-INIT;
dréim+Verbal+Adj:dréimthe VA-INIT;
éagsúlaigh+Verbal+Adj:éagsúlaithe VA-INIT;
eitigh+Verbal+Adj:eitithe VA-INIT;
feabhsaigh+Verbal+Adj:feabhsaithe VA-INIT;
fithisigh+Verbal+Adj:fithisithe VA-INIT;
formhéadaigh+Verbal+Adj:formhéadaithe VA-INIT;
fuathaigh+Verbal+Adj:fuathaithe VA-INIT;
geallearb+Verbal+Adj:geallearbtha VA-INIT;
gligleáil+Verbal+Adj:gligleáilte VA-INIT;
graf+Verbal+Adj:grafa VA-INIT;
guigh+Verbal+Adj:guite VA-INIT;
imscríobh+Verbal+Adj:imscríofa VA-INIT;
ionadaigh+Verbal+Adj:ionadaithe VA-INIT;
lainseáil+Verbal+Adj:lainseáilte VA-INIT;
léas+Verbal+Adj:léasta VA-INIT;
líon+Verbal+Adj:líonta VA-INIT;
luainigh+Verbal+Adj:luainithe VA-INIT;
maothaigh+Verbal+Adj:maothaithe VA-INIT;
mím+Verbal+Adj:mímthe VA-INIT;
muilleáil+Verbal+Adj:muilleáilte VA-INIT;
ob+Verbal+Adj:obtha VA-INIT;
paitinnigh+Verbal+Adj:paitinnithe VA-INIT;
plandaigh+Verbal+Adj:plandaithe VA-INIT;
praeitseáil+Verbal+Adj:praeitseáilte VA-INIT;
raiceáil+Verbal+Adj:raiceáilte VA-INIT;
rialaigh+Verbal+Adj:rialaithe VA-INIT;
rop+Verbal+Adj:roptha VA-INIT;
salaigh+Verbal+Adj:salaithe VA-INIT;
scáthlínigh+Verbal+Adj:scáthlínithe VA-INIT;
scoilt+Verbal+Adj:scoilte VA-INIT;
seadaigh+Verbal+Adj:seadaithe VA-INIT;
siolp+Verbal+Adj:siolptha VA-INIT;
sligh+Verbal+Adj:slighthe VA-INIT;
smut+Verbal+Adj:smuta VA-INIT;
spágáil+Verbal+Adj:spágáilte VA-INIT;
spruigeáil+Verbal+Adj:spruigeáilte VA-INIT;
steall+Verbal+Adj:steallta VA-INIT;
stucáil+Verbal+Adj:stucáilte VA-INIT;
táirg+Verbal+Adj:táirgthe VA-INIT;
tatuáil+Verbal+Adj:tatuáilte VA-INIT;
tar+Verbal+Adj:tagtha VA-INIT;
toghair+Verbal+Adj:toghartha VA-INIT;
traoch+Verbal+Adj:traochta VA-INIT;
truaillmheasc+Verbal+Adj:truaillmheasctha VA-INIT;
uasmhéadaigh+Verbal+Adj:uasmhéadaithe VA-INIT;
LEXICON VerbalNounsGenV
airigh+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:aireachtála VN-INIT;
atharmáil+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:atharmála VN-INIT;
bailc+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:balctha VN-INIT;
braigeáil+Verbal+Noun+VI+Gen:braigeála VN-INIT;
caígh+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:caí VN-INIT;
ceiliúir+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:ceiliúrtha VN-INIT;
clóscríobh+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:clóscríofa VN-INIT;
comardaigh+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:comardaithe VN-INIT;
crandaigh+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:crandaithe VN-INIT;
cuingrigh+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:cuingrithe VN-INIT;
deiseáil+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:deiseála VN-INIT;
diúl+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:diúil VN-INIT;
éagsúlaigh+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:éagsúlaithe VN-INIT;
feabhsaigh+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:feabhsaithe VN-INIT;
formhéadaigh+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:formhéadaithe VN-INIT;
geallearb+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:geallearbtha VN-INIT;
graibeáil+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:graibeála VN-INIT;
imscríobh+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:imscríofa VN-INIT;
lainseáil+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:lainseála VN-INIT;
líon+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:líonta VN-INIT;
maothaigh+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:maothaithe VN-INIT;
muilleáil+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:muilleála VN-INIT;
paitinnigh+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:paitinnithe VN-INIT;
praeitseáil+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:praeitseála VN-INIT;
rialaigh+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:rialaithe VN-INIT;
salaigh+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:salaithe VN-INIT;
scoilt+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:scoilte VN-INIT;
síolraigh+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:síolraithe VN-INIT;
snaidhm+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:snaidhmthe VN-INIT;
sprúill+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:sprúillte VN-INIT;
stumpáil+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:stumpála VN-INIT;
tar+Verbal+Noun+VI+Gen:teachta VN-INIT;
togair+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:togartha VN-INIT;
truaigh+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:truaite VN-INIT;
LEXICON VN-Variants
baslú+Verbal+Noun+VT:baslú		VN-INIT;	! Headword: baslaigh (v.t. ); (Var: vn. baslú m)
clampáilte+Verbal+Adj:clampáilte		VA-INIT;
lámhachtain+Verbal+Noun+VTI:lámhachtain		VN-INIT;	! Headword: lámhach (v.t. & i. ); (Var: vn. ~adh m, ~tain(t) f)
smeádaráilte+Verbal+Adj:smeádaráilte		VA-INIT;
LEXICON VNEqualVariants
dúbladh+Verbal+Noun+VT:dúbladh		VN-INIT;
gréasadh+Verbal+Noun+VT+Len:gréasadh		VN-INIT;
mársáil+Verbal+Noun+VTI+Gen:mársála		VN-INIT;
púiscthe+Verbal+Adj:púiscthe		VA-INIT;
ruagradh+Verbal+Noun+VTI:ruagradh		VN-INIT;
táthadh+Verbal+Noun+VTI:táthadh		VN-INIT;
cnúbháilte+Verbal+Adj:cnúbháilte		VA-INIT;
coirteáil+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:coirteála		VN-INIT;
trustáilte+Verbal+Adj:trustáilte		VA-INIT;
caomhaint+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen:caomhana		VN-INIT;
